Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5890.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "hazardous products act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Intentionally added PFAS" means PFAS that a manufacturer intentionally added to and that has a functional or technical effect on a product, or a component of that product, or the manufacturing process. Intentionally added PFAS includes any PFAS that is a component or a breakdown product of an intentionally added chemical that has a functional or technical effect on the product, or a component of that product, or the manufacturing process. (b) "Manufacturer" means a person that manufactures a product or whose brand name is affixed to the product that is sold or offered or distributed for sale in this state. Manufacturer includes an importer or first domestic distributer of a product that is imported into the United States. (c) "PFAS" means a perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance that includes any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom. (d) "Product" means an item, or a component of that item, that is produced, distributed, sold, manufactured, or packaged for wholesale, personal, residential, commercial, retail, or industrial use. Sec. 5. Beginning on January 1, 2027, a person shall not manufacture for sale any of the following products, if the product contains intentionally added PFAS: (a) Apparel, which includes clothing items intended for regular wear or formal occasions, including, but not limited to, undergarments, shirts, pants, skirts, dresses, overalls, bodysuits, costumes, vests, dancewear, suits, saris, scarves, tops, leggings, school uniforms, leisurewear, athletic wear, sports uniforms, everyday swimwear, formal wear, onesies, bibs, diapers, footwear, outdoor apparel, outdoor apparel for severe wet conditions, and everyday uniforms for workwear. Apparel does not include personal protective equipment or items for use by the United States military. (b) Carpets, rugs, or another similar fabric that is marketed or intended for use as a floor covering. (c) Cleaning products, which are used primarily for janitorial, household, or institutional cleaning purposes, such as an air care, automotive, general cleaning, or a polish or floor maintenance product. (d) Cookware, which are durable items that are used in homes and food establishments to prepare, dispense, or store food, and includes, but is not limited to, pots, pans, skillets, grills, baking sheets, baking molds, trays, bowls, and cooking utensils. (e) Cosmetics, which include any item, or component part of that item, that is intended to be rubbed, poured, sprinkled, sprayed on, introduced into, or otherwise applied to the human body or any part of the human body for cleansing, beautifying, promoting attractiveness, or altering the appearance. (f) Dental floss, which is a waxed or unwaxed thread used to remove food particles and plaque from between the teeth and under the gums. (g) Fabric treatments or other similar substances that are applied to fabric to give the fabric 1 or more characteristics, such as stain or water resistance. (h) Juvenile products, which include any product designed for use by infants and children who are less than 12 years of age, such as a baby or toddler foam pillow, bassinet, bedside sleeper, booster seat, changing pad, child restraint system for use in motor vehicles and aircraft, co-sleeper, crib mattress, floor playmat, high chair, high chair pad, infant bouncer, infant carrier, infant seat, infant sleep positioner, infant swing, infant travel bed, infant walker, nap cot, nursing pad, nursing pillow, playmat, non-electric toys, playpen, play yard, polyurethane foam mat, pad, or pillow, portable foam nap mat, portable infant sleeper, portable hook-on chair, soft-sided portable crib, stroller, and toddler mattress. (i) Menstruation products, which include any disposable or reusable product used to collect menstruation and vaginal discharge, such as tampons, pads, sponges, menstruation underwear, discs, and menstrual cups. (j) Textile furnishings, which include any type of textile customarily used in households and businesses, such as draperies, floor coverings, furnishings, bedding, towels, and tablecloths. (k) Ski wax or other similar lubricant that is applied to the bottom of snow runners. (l) Upholstered furniture, which includes any article of furniture that is designed to be used for sitting, resting, or reclining and that is wholly or partly stuffed or filled with any filling material. Sec. 9. A person that violates this act is subject to penalties as follows: (a) For a first offense, guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. (b) For a second offense, guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days, a fine of not more than $1,500.00, or both. (c) For a third or subsequent offense, guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than 2 years and a fine of not more than $2,000.00. Sec. 11. (1) A person may bring an action to do either or both of the following: (a) Obtain a declaratory judgment that a person is manufacturing for sale products that violate section 5. (b) Enjoin in accordance with the principles of equity a person that is manufacturing or intends to manufacture for sale products that violate section 5. (2) Except in a class action, a person that suffers loss as a result of a violation of section 5 may bring an action to recover actual damages or $500.00, whichever is greater, together with reasonable attorney fees. In an action brought under this subsection, the court may, in the court's discretion, award punitive damages. (3) A person that suffers loss as a result of a violation of section 5 may bring a class action on behalf of persons residing or injured in this state for the actual damages caused by a product manufactured for sale in violation of section 5. (4) On motion of a person and without bond in an action brought under subsection (3), the court may make an appropriate order to do 1 or more of the following: (a) Reimburse persons that have suffered damages. (b) Carry out a transaction in accordance with the aggrieved persons' reasonable expectations. (c) Grant other appropriate relief. (5) In an action brought under subsection (3), the court after a hearing may appoint a receiver or order sequestration of the defendant's assets if it appears to the satisfaction of the court that the defendant threatens or is about to remove, conceal, or dispose of the defendant's assets to the detriment of members of the class. (6) If at any stage of proceedings brought under subsection (3) the court requires that notice be sent to the class, a person may petition the court to require the defendant to bear the cost of notice. In determining whether to impose the cost on the defendant or the plaintiff, the court shall consider the probability that the person will succeed on the merits of the person's action. (7) If the defendant shows by a preponderance of the evidence that a violation of section 5 resulted from a bona fide error notwithstanding the maintenance of procedures reasonably adapted to avoid the error, the amount of recovery is limited to actual damages. (8) An action under this section must not be brought more than 6 years after the transaction that is the subject of the action. However, if a person commences an action against another person, the defendant may assert, as a defense or counterclaim, any claim under this act that arises out of the transaction that is the subject of the action.